Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.850

Abortion coverage—Cost sharing.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a health plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, that provides coverage for abortion may not impose cost sharing for the abortion of a pregnancy.

(2) For a health plan that provides coverage for abortion of a pregnancy and is offered as a qualifying health plan for a health savings account, the health plan shall establish the plan's cost sharing for the coverage required by this section at the minimum level necessary to preserve the enrollee's ability to claim tax exempt contributions and withdrawals from the enrollee's health savings account under internal revenue service laws and regulations.

[ 2023 c 194 s 2.]